Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 22. Insurance Holding Companies.
Sec. 21.22.080.
Transactions within an insurance holding company system.

Material transactions by registered insurers with their affiliates are subject to the following standards:

the terms shall be fair and reasonable;

charges or fees for services performed shall be reasonable;

expenses incurred and payment received shall be allocated to the insurer in conformity with customary insurance accounting practices consistently applied;

the books, accounts, and records of each party to the transactions shall be maintained so as to disclose clearly and accurately the nature and details of the transactions including accounting information that is necessary to support the reasonableness of the charges or fees to the respective parties;

the insurer’s surplus as regards policyholders following any dividends or distributions to shareholder affiliates or performance under a material transaction with an affiliate shall be reasonable in relation to the insurer’s outstanding liabilities and adequate to its financial needs; and

agreements for cost-sharing services and management must include the provisions required by regulations adopted by the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976; am § 39 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 35 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (4), inserted “to the transactions” following “records of each party” and deleted “precise” preceding “nature and details”, added (6), and made related changes.

Sec. 21.22.085.
Transactions involving a domestic insurer requiring director review.

Transactions involving a domestic insurer and a person in its insurance holding company system, including amendments or modifications of affiliate agreements previously filed under AS

21.22.080

that are subject to a materiality standard in (1) — (7) of this subsection, may not be entered into unless the insurer has notified the director in writing of the insurer’s intention to enter into the transaction at least 30 days before the transaction, or a shorter period if allowed by the director, and the director has not disapproved the transaction within the required notice period. The notice of amendments or modifications must include the reasons for the change and the financial effect on the domestic insurer. A domestic insurer shall provide to the director notice, within 30 days after a termination of a previously filed agreement, for determination of the type of filing required, if any. The requirements in this section apply to the following transactions:

a sale, purchase, exchange, loan or extension of credit, or investment, provided the transaction is equal to or exceeds

with respect to insurers other than life insurers, the lesser of three percent of the insurer’s admitted assets or 25 percent of surplus that pertains to policyholders, as of December 31 of the previous calendar year; or

with respect to life insurers, three percent of the insurer’s admitted assets as of December 31 of the previous calendar year;

a loan or extension of credit to a person who is not an affiliate, where the insurer makes loans or extensions of credit with the agreement or understanding that the proceeds of the transaction, in whole or in substantial part, are to be used to make a loan or extension of credit to, purchase an asset of, or make an investment in an affiliate of the insurer making the loan or extension of credit, provided the transaction is equal to or exceeds

with respect to insurers other than life insurers, the lesser of three percent of the insurer’s admitted assets or 25 percent of surplus that pertains to policyholder surplus, as of December 31 of the previous calendar year; or

with respect to life insurers, three percent of the insurer’s admitted assets as of December 31 of the previous calendar year;

a reinsurance agreement or modification, including

a reinsurance pooling agreement;

an agreement in which the reinsurance premium or change in the insurer’s liabilities, or the projected reinsurance premium or a change in the insurer’s liabilities in any of the three years after entering into the agreement or modification, equals or exceeds five percent of surplus that pertains to policyholders as of December 31 of the previous calendar year, including an agreement that may require as consideration the transfer of assets from an insurer to a nonaffiliate if an agreement or understanding exists between the insurer and nonaffiliate that a portion of the assets will be transferred to one or more affiliates of the insurer;

a management agreement, service contract, tax allocation agreement, guarantee, or cost-sharing arrangement;

a material transaction specified by regulation that the director determines may adversely affect the interests of the insurer’s policyholders;

a guarantee if made by a domestic insurer, except that a guarantee that is quantifiable as to amount is not subject to the notice requirements of this subsection unless it exceeds the lesser of one-half of one percent of the insurer’s admitted assets or 10 percent of surplus that pertains to policyholders as of December 31 of the previous calendar year; a guarantee that is not quantifiable as to amount is subject to the notice requirements of this subsection; and

a direct or an indirect acquisition or investment in a person that controls an insurer or in an affiliate of the insurer in an amount that, together with the person’s present holdings in the investment, exceeds two and one-half percent of surplus that pertains to policyholders; direct or indirect acquisitions or investments in subsidiaries authorized under this title or regulations adopted by the director or in nonsubsidiary insurance affiliates that are subject to the provisions of this chapter are exempt from this requirement.

Nothing in (a) of this section authorizes or permits a transaction that, in the case of an insurer not a member of the same holding company system, would violate a provision of law.

A domestic insurer may not enter into a transaction that is part of a plan or series of similar transactions with persons within the holding company system if the purpose of the separate transaction is to avoid the statutory threshold amount and avoid review that would otherwise occur. If the director determines that this separate transaction is entered into over a 12-month period for this purpose, the director may impose penalties under AS

21.22.065(i)

,

21.22.170

, AS

21.36.360(a)

, and

21.36.910

.

The director, in reviewing a transaction under this section, shall consider whether the transaction complies with the standards provided in AS

21.22.080

and whether the transaction may adversely affect the interests of policyholders.

A domestic insurer shall notify the director within 30 days of an investment of a domestic insurer in a corporation if, after the investment, the total investment by the insurance holding company system in a corporation exceeds 10 percent of the corporation’s voting securities.

History.

(§ 40 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 36 ch 34 SLA 2015; am § 2 ch 12 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2010, “AS

21.36.360(a)

and

21.36.910

” was substituted for “AS

21.36.320

and

21.36.360(a)

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS

21.36.320

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, rewrote the introductory language in (a), which read, “The following transactions involving a domestic insurer and a person in its holding company system may not be entered into unless the insurer has notified the director in writing of the insurer’s intention to enter into the transaction at least 30 days before the transaction, or a shorter period if allowed by the director, and the director has not disapproved the transaction within the required notice period:”, in (a)(1), deleted “guarantee,” following “extension of credit,”, in (a)(1)(A), substituted “policyholders, as of December 31 of the calendar year in which the transaction took place” for “policyholder surplus, each calculated under AS

21.21.020(d)

”, in (a)(1)(B), substituted “as of December 31 of the calendar year in which the transaction took place” for “calculated under AS

21.21.020(d)

”, in (a)(2)(A), substituted “as of December 31 of the calendar year in which the transaction took place” for “each calculated under AS 21.21.020(d)”, in (a)(2)(B), substituted “as of December 31 of the calendar year in which the transaction took place” for “each calculated under AS 21.21.020(d)”, rewrote (a)(3), which read, “a reinsurance agreement or modification in which the reinsurance premium or change in the insurer’s liabilities equals or exceeds five percent of the insurer’s surplus that pertains to policyholder surplus, calculated under AS 21.21.020(d), including an agreement that may require as consideration the transfer of assets from an insurer to a nonaffiliate if an agreement or understanding exists between the insurer and nonaffiliate that a portion of the assets will be transferred to an affiliate of the insurer;”, in (a)(4), inserted “tax allocation agreement, guarantee,” following “service contract,”, added (a)(6) and (a)(7).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 20, 2019, in (a), substituted “the previous calendar year” for “the calendar year in which the transaction took place” six times.

Sec. 21.22.090.
Adequacy of surplus.

For the purposes of this chapter, in determining whether an insurer’s surplus as regards policyholders is reasonable in relation to the insurer’s outstanding liabilities and adequate to its financial needs, the following factors, among others, shall be considered:

the size of the insurer as measured by its assets, capital and surplus, reserves, premium writings, insurance in force, and other appropriate criteria;

the extent to which the insurer’s business is diversified among the several lines of insurance;

the number and size of risks insured in each line of business;

the extent of the geographical dispersion of the insurer’s insured risk;

the nature and extent of the insurer’s reinsurance program;

the quality, diversification, and liquidity of the insurer’s investment portfolio;

the recent past and projected future trend in the value of the insurer’s investments;

the surplus as regards policyholders maintained by other comparable insurers;

the adequacy of the insurer’s reserves; and

the quality and liquidity of investments in affiliates made under AS 21.21; the director may treat any such investment as a disallowed asset for purposes of determining the adequacy of surplus as regards policyholders whenever the director determines the investment warrants it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976; am § 41 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Sec. 21.22.100.
Dividends and other distributions.

A domestic insurer may not pay any extraordinary dividend or make any other extraordinary distribution to its shareholders until

30 days after the director has received notice of the declaration of the dividend or distribution and has not within that period disapproved its payment; or

the director has approved its payment within the 30-day period.

For purposes of this section, an extraordinary dividend or distribution includes a dividend or distribution of cash or other property, the fair market value of which together with that of other dividends or distributions made within the preceding 12 months exceeds the lesser of (1) 10 percent of the insurer’s surplus as regards policyholders as of December 31 of the preceding year; or (2) the net gain from operations of the insurer, if the insurer is a life insurer, or the net investment income, if the insurer is not a life insurer, for the 12-month period ending December 31 of the preceding year; but does not include pro rata distributions of any class of the insurer’s own securities. In determining whether a dividend or distribution is extraordinary, an insurer other than a life insurer may carry forward net income from the previous two calendar years that has not already been paid out as dividends. The carry forward provision shall be computed by taking the net income from the second and third preceding calendar years, not including realized capital gains, less dividends paid in the second and immediate preceding calendar years.

Notwithstanding AS

21.69.490

, an insurer may declare an extraordinary dividend or distribution that is conditional upon the director’s approval. A declaration confers no rights upon shareholders until

the director has approved the payment of the dividend or distribution; or

the director has not disapproved the payment within the 30-day period referred to in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976; am §§ 42, 43 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For insurance holding companies, see 3 AAC 21, art. 1.

Sec. 21.22.105.
Management of domestic insurers subject to registration.

Notwithstanding the control of a domestic insurer by any person, the officers and directors of the insurer may not be relieved of an obligation or liability to which the officers and directors would otherwise be subject to by law, and the insurer shall be managed so as to assure the insurer’s separate operating identity consistent with this title.

This section does not preclude a domestic insurer from having or sharing a common management or cooperative or joint use of personnel, property, or services with one or more other persons under arrangements meeting the standards of AS

21.22.080

.

History.

(§ 44 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Sec. 21.22.110.
Examination.

In addition to the director’s authority to examine insurers under AS

21.06.120

—

21.06.170

, the director may examine an insurer registered under AS

21.22.060

and its affiliates to ascertain the financial condition of the insurer, including the enterprise risk to the insurer by the ultimate controlling party, by any entity or combination of entities within the insurance holding company system, or by the insurance holding company system on a consolidated basis.

The director may

order an insurer registered under AS

21.22.060

to produce the records, books, or other information or papers in the possession of the insurer or its affiliates that are reasonably necessary to determine compliance with this chapter;

order an insurer registered under AS

21.22.060

to produce information not in the possession of the insurer if the insurer can obtain access to the information under contractual relationships, statutory obligations, or other method; in the event the insurer cannot obtain the information requested by the director, the insurer shall provide the director a detailed explanation of the reason that the insurer cannot obtain the information and the identity of the holder of information; if the director determines that the detailed explanation is without merit, the director may, after notice and hearing, require the insurer to pay a penalty of $250 for each day’s delay in providing the requested information, or may suspend or revoke the insurer’s license;

in the event the insurer fails to comply with an order under this subsection, examine or issue subpoenas to the insurer’s affiliates to obtain the information.

The director may retain, at the registered insurer’s expense, attorneys, actuaries, accountants, and other experts not otherwise a part of the director’s staff as may be necessary to assist in the conduct of an examination under (a) of this section. Any persons so retained are under the direction and control of the director and shall act in a purely advisory capacity.

Each registered insurer producing for examination records, books, and papers under (a) of this section is liable for and shall pay the expense of an examination in accordance with AS

21.06.160

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976; am §§ 37, 38 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, repealed and reenacted (a), which read, “Subject to the limitation in (b) of this section, the director may order an insurer registered under AS

21.22.060

to produce records, books, or other information or papers in the possession of the insurer or its affiliates as are necessary to ascertain the financial condition or legality of conduct of the insurer.
If an insurer fails to comply with the director’s order, the director may examine the insurer’s affiliates to obtain the information required.”; repealed and reenacted (b), which read, “The director shall exercise the power under (a) of this section only if the examination of the insurer under AS

21.06.120

—

21.06.170

is inadequate or the interests of the policyholders of the insurer may be adversely affected.”

Sec. 21.22.115.
Supervisory colleges.

With respect to an insurer registered under AS

21.22.060

, and in accordance with (c) of this section, the director may participate in a supervisory college for a domestic insurer that is part of an insurance holding company system with international operations to determine the insurer’s compliance with this chapter. The director may

initiate the establishment of a supervisory college;

clarify the membership and participation of other supervisors in the supervisory college;

clarify the functions of the supervisory college and the role of other regulators, including the establishment of a group-wide supervisor;

coordinate the ongoing activities of the supervisory college, including planning meetings, supervisory activities, and processes for information sharing; and

establish a crisis management plan.

An insurer subject to this section is liable for and shall pay the reasonable expenses of the director’s participation in a supervisory college in accordance with (c) of this section, including reasonable travel expenses. Under this section, a supervisory college may be convened as either a temporary or permanent forum for communication and cooperation between the regulators charged with the supervision of the insurer or its affiliates, and the director may establish a regular assessment to the insurer for the payment of those expenses.

To assess the business strategy, financial position, legal and regulatory position, risk exposure, risk management, and governance processes, and as part of the examination of individual insurers in accordance with AS

21.22.110

, the director may participate in a supervisory college with other regulators charged with supervision of the insurer or its affiliates, including other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies. The director may enter into agreements in accordance with AS

21.06.060

and AS

21.22.120

to share confidential information between the director and regulatory agencies or other members of the supervisory college.

Nothing in this section delegates to the supervisory college the director’s authority to regulate or supervise an insurer or its affiliates under this title.

History.

(§ 39 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 54, ch. 34, SLA 2015 makes this section effective July 1, 2015.

Sec. 21.22.117.
Group-wide supervision of internationally active insurance groups.

The director may act as the group-wide supervisor for an internationally active insurance group in accordance with this section. However, the director may acknowledge another regulatory official as the group-wide supervisor if the internationally active insurance group

does not have substantial insurance operations in the United States;

has substantial insurance operations in the United States but not in this state; or

has substantial insurance operations in the United States and this state, but the director has determined under (b) or (f) of this section that the other regulatory official is the appropriate group-wide supervisor; an insurance holding company system that does not otherwise qualify as an internationally active insurance group may request that the director make a determination or acknowledgment of a group-wide supervisor under this section.

In cooperation with other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies, the director shall identify a single group-wide supervisor for an internationally active insurance group. The director may determine that the director is the appropriate group-wide supervisor for an internationally active insurance group that conducts substantial insurance operations concentrated in this state. However, the director may acknowledge that a regulatory official from another jurisdiction is the appropriate group-wide supervisor for the internationally active insurance group. The director shall consider the following factors when making a determination or acknowledgment under this subsection:

the place of domicile of the insurers within the internationally active insurance group that hold the largest share of the group’s written premiums, assets, or liabilities;

the place of domicile of the top-tiered insurer or insurers in the insurance holding company system of the internationally active insurance group;

the location of the executive offices or largest operational offices of the internationally active insurance group;

whether another regulatory official is acting or is seeking to act as the group-wide supervisor under a regulatory system that the director determines to be

substantially similar to the system of regulation provided under the laws of this state; or

otherwise sufficient in terms of providing for group-wide supervision, enterprise risk analysis, and cooperation with other regulatory officials; and

whether another regulatory official acting or seeking to act as the group-wide supervisor provides the director with reasonably reciprocal recognition and cooperation; a regulatory official identified under this section as the group-wide supervisor may determine that it is appropriate to acknowledge another supervisor to serve as the group-wide supervisor; the regulatory official shall consider the factors listed in this subsection when making an acknowledgment under this subsection and shall make the acknowledgment in cooperation with, and subject to, the acknowledgment of other regulatory officials involved with supervision of members of the internationally active insurance group and in consultation with the internationally active insurance group.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when another regulatory official is acting as the group-wide supervisor of an internationally active insurance group, the director shall acknowledge that regulatory official as the group-wide supervisor. However, the director shall make a determination or acknowledgment of the appropriate group-wide supervisor for the internationally active insurance group under (b) of this section in the event of a material change in the internationally active insurance group that results in

the internationally active insurance group’s insurers domiciled in this state holding the largest share of the group’s premiums, assets, or liabilities; or

this state being the place of domicile of the top-tiered insurer or insurers in the insurance holding company system of the internationally active insurance group.

Under AS

21.22.110

, the director may collect from an insurer registered under AS

21.22.060

the information necessary to determine whether the director may act as the group-wide supervisor of an internationally active insurance group or if the director may acknowledge another regulatory official to act as the group-wide supervisor. Before issuing a determination that an internationally active insurance group is subject to group-wide supervision, the director shall notify the insurer registered under AS

21.22.060

and the ultimate controlling person within the internationally active insurance group. Upon notification, the internationally active insurance group has a minimum of 30 days to provide the director with additional information pertinent to the pending determination. The director may publish on the division’s Internet website the identity of internationally active insurance groups that the director has determined are subject to group-wide supervision by the director.

If the director is the group-wide supervisor for an internationally active insurance group, the director may

assess the enterprise risks in the internationally active insurance group to ensure

the material financial condition and liquidity risks to members of the internationally active insurance group that are engaged in the business of insurance are identified by management; and

reasonable and effective mitigation measures are in place;

request from a member of an internationally active insurance group subject to the director’s supervision information necessary and appropriate to assess enterprise risk, including information about the members of the internationally active insurance group regarding

governance, risk assessment, and management;

capital adequacy; and

material intercompany transactions;

coordinate and, through the authority of the regulatory officials of the jurisdictions where members of the internationally active insurance group are domiciled, compel development and implementation of reasonable measures designed to ensure that the internationally active insurance group is able to timely recognize and mitigate enterprise risks to members of the internationally active insurance group that are engaged in the business of insurance;

communicate with other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies for members in the internationally active insurance group and share relevant information subject to the confidentiality provisions under AS

21.22.120

, through supervisory colleges under AS

21.22.115

or otherwise;

enter into agreements with, or obtain documentation from, an insurer registered under AS

21.22.060

, a member of the internationally active insurance group, or a state, federal, or international regulatory agency for members of the internationally active insurance group, providing the basis for, or otherwise clarifying, the director’s role as group-wide supervisor, including provisions for resolving disputes with other regulatory officials; the agreements or documentation may not serve as evidence in a proceeding against an insurer or person in an insurance holding company system not domiciled or incorporated in this state or doing business in this state or otherwise subject to jurisdiction in this state; and

perform other group-wide supervision activities, consistent with the authorities and purposes set out in this subsection.

If the director acknowledges that another regulatory official from a jurisdiction that is not accredited by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners is the group-wide supervisor, the director may reasonably cooperate, through supervisory colleges or otherwise, with group-wide supervision undertaken by the group-wide supervisor under the following conditions:

the director’s cooperation is in compliance with the laws of this state; and

the regulatory official acknowledged as the group-wide supervisor recognizes and cooperates with the director’s activities as a group-wide supervisor for other internationally active insurance groups, where applicable; if recognition and cooperation is not reasonably reciprocal, the director may refuse recognition and cooperation.

The director may enter into agreements with, or obtain documentation from, an insurer registered under AS

21.22.060

, an affiliate of the insurer, or other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies for members of the internationally active insurance group, that provide the basis for, or otherwise clarify, a regulatory official’s role as group-wide supervisor.

A registered insurer subject to this section is liable for and shall pay the reasonable expenses of the director’s participation in the administration of this section, including the engagement of attorneys, actuaries, and other professionals, and all reasonable travel expenses.

History.

(§ 3 ch 12 SLA 2019)

Effective dates. —

Section 10,
ch. 12, SLA 2019 makes this section effective July 20, 2019, in accordance with
AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Editor's notes. —

Section 8, ch. 12, SLA 2019 provides that the enactment of this section has the effect of amending Rule 402, Alaska Rules of Evidence, by precluding admissibility of documents, materials, or other information in the possession or control of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners relating to insurance holding companies and insurance holding company systems.

Sec. 21.22.120.
Confidentiality.

All information, documents, holding company analyses, insurer profile summaries, and copies of the information and documents obtained by or disclosed to the director or any other person in the course of an examination or investigation made under AS

21.22.110

and all information reported under AS

21.22.020(b)

,

21.22.060

,

21.22.085

—

21.22.105

, and

21.22.117

and all preacquisition notification information received under AS

21.22.065

shall be given confidential treatment under AS

21.06.060

. However, if the director, after giving the insurer and its affiliates who would be affected by publication of the information notice and opportunity to be heard, determines that the interests of policyholders, shareholders, or the public will be served by the publication of the information, the director may publish all or part of the information in the manner the director considers appropriate.

The director may

share documents, materials, or other information, including the confidential information under (a) of this section, with state, federal, and international regulatory agencies, the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and state, federal, and international law enforcement authorities, including members of a supervisory college described in AS

21.22.115

, if the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality of the document, material, or other information and has verified in writing the legal authority to maintain confidentiality;

not share confidential documents, material, or information reported under AS

21.22.060(n)

with the insurance regulator of another state, unless the statutes or regulations of the other state are substantially similar to this section and the other state has agreed in writing not to disclose the information;

enter into a written agreement with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners governing sharing and use of information obtained under this chapter that must

specify procedures and protocols regarding the confidentiality and security of information shared with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries under this chapter, including procedures and protocols for sharing by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners with state, federal, or international regulators;

specify that ownership of information shared with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries under this chapter remains with the director and that the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ use of the information is subject to the direction of the director;

require prompt notice to be given to an insurer whose confidential information in possession of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners under this chapter is subject to a request or subpoena to the National Association of Insurance Commissioners for disclosure or production; and

require the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries to consent to intervention by an insurer in a judicial or administrative action in which the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries may be required to disclose confidential information about the insurer shared with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries under this chapter.

The director or a person who receives documents, materials, or other information while acting under the authority of the director or with whom documents, materials, or other information are shared under this chapter may not be permitted or required to testify in any private civil action concerning confidential documents, materials, or information subject to (a) of this section.

The sharing of information by the director under this chapter does not constitute a delegation of regulatory authority or rulemaking. The director is solely responsible for the administration, execution, and enforcement of this chapter.

A waiver of an applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in the documents, materials, or information under (a) of this section may not be given as a result of disclosure to the director under this section or as a result of sharing as authorized under (b) of this section.

Documents, materials, or other information in the possession or control of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners under this chapter

are confidential by law;

are not subject to

AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.220

;

subpoena; or

discovery or admissible in evidence in any private action.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976; am § 45 ch 67 SLA 1992; am §§ 40, 41 ch 34 SLA 2015; am §§
4, 5 ch 12 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), in the first sentence, inserted “holding company analyses, insurer profile summaries,” following “All information, documents,”, substituted “all information reported under AS

21.22.020(b)

,

21.22.060

, and

21.22.085

—

21.22.105

,” for “all information reported under AS

21.22.060

” and substituted “confidential treatment under AS

21.06.060

” for “confidential treatment and may not be made public by the director or any other person, except to insurance agencies of other states, without the prior written consent of the insurer to which it pertains”; added (b).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 20, 2019, in (a), in the list of citations, added “and 21.22.117” and made a related change; added(c) through (f).

Editor's notes. —

Section 8,
ch. 12, SLA 2019 provides that the enactment of this section has the effect of amending Rule 26, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, by precluding discovery of documents, materials, or other information in the possession or control of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners under this chapter, Rule 402, Alaska Rules of Evidence, by precluding admissibility of documents, materials, or other information in the possession or control of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners under this chapter, and Rule 501, Alaska Rules of Evidence, by creating a new privilege relating to insurance holding companies and insurance holding company systems.

Sec. 21.22.130.
Regulations.

The director may adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For insurance holding companies, see 3 AAC 21, art. 1.

Sec. 21.22.140.
Injunctions.

If it appears to the director that an insurer or a director, officer, employee, or agent of an insurer has violated or is about to violate this chapter or a regulation adopted or an order issued by the director under this chapter, the director may apply to the superior court in the judicial district in which the principal office of the insurer is located or if the insurer has no office in this state then to the superior court in the first judicial district for an order enjoining the insurer or a director, officer, employee, or agent of the insurer from the violation, and for other relief as the nature of the case and the interests of the insurer’s policyholders, creditors and shareholders or the public may require.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976)

Sec. 21.22.150.
Voting of certain securities prohibited.

A security that is the subject of any agreement or arrangement regarding acquisition, or that is acquired or to be acquired, in contravention of this chapter or a regulation adopted or an order issued by the director under this chapter may not be voted at a shareholders’ meeting or be counted for quorum purposes, and any action of shareholders requiring the affirmative vote of a percentage of shares may be taken as though those securities were not issued and outstanding; but an action taken at such a meeting may not be invalidated by the voting of those securities, unless the action would materially affect control of the insurer or unless the courts of this state have so ordered.

If an insurer or the director has reason to believe that a security of the insurer has been or is about to be acquired in contravention of this chapter or a regulation adopted or an order issued by the director under this chapter, the insurer or the director may apply to the superior court in the first judicial district or the superior court in the judicial district in which the insurer has its principal place of business to enjoin any offer, request, invitation, agreement, or acquisition made in contravention of this chapter or a regulation adopted or an order issued by the director under this chapter, to enjoin the voting of any security so acquired, to void any vote of a security already cast at a meeting of shareholders, and for other relief as the nature of the case and the interests of the insurer’s policyholders, creditors and shareholders or the public may require.

This section does not apply to a security that constitutes an acquisition covered by AS

21.22.065

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976; am § 46 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Sec. 21.22.160.
Sequestration of voting securities.

If a person has acquired or is proposing to acquire voting securities in violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted or an order issued by the director under this chapter, the insurer or the director may make an application in the superior court in the first judicial district or the superior court in the judicial district in which the insurer has its principal place of business to seize or sequester any voting securities of the insurer owned directly or indirectly by that person, and the court may issue an order with respect to those securities as may be appropriate to effectuate this chapter. For the purposes of this chapter the situs of the ownership of the securities of domestic insurers is considered to be in this state.

This section does not apply to a security that constitutes an acquisition covered by AS

21.22.065

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976; am § 47 ch 67 SLA 1992)